Missouri, session 2026, HB2083.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.622, to read as follows:
191.622. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Health care provider":
(a) An employee of a health facility; or
(b) A person providing health care services, including those licensed, certified, or
registered under, or subject to, sections 324.050 to 324.089; sections 324.475 to 324.499;
or chapter 190, 198, 330, 331, 332, 334, 335, 336, or 338;
(2) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(3) "Health facility", a facility as defined in section 376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a health care provider
providing health care services shall be immune from criminal liability for any harm or
damages alleged to arise from an act or omission relating to the provision of health care
services except as provided in subsection 3 of this section.
3. Nothing in this section limits any liability for gross negligence or wanton,
willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2083 2
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend, repeal, or alter any other
immunity, defense, limitation of liability, or procedure available or required under any
other law or contract.
✔